Massachusetts, session 194th, S2901.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 5 of chapter 59 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2024
Official Edition, is hereby amended by striking out, in line 1077, the word “ten” and inserting in
place thereof the figure:- 7.
SECTION 2. Said section 5 of said chapter 59, as so appearing, is hereby further
amended by inserting after the word “or”, in line 1261, the following words:- the expiration of 1
year after.
SECTION 3. Said section 5 of said chapter 59, as so appearing, is hereby further
amended by inserting after the word “or”, in line 1267, the following words:- the expiration of 1
year after.
of 1